Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-30] Uniformity of application and
construction. This part shall be applied and construed to effectuate its
general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this
part among states enacting it. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next